tools/nvda/louis/tables/da-dk-g28.ctb
nofor always A 17
nofor always B 127
nofor always C 147
nofor always D 1457
nofor always E 157
nofor always F 1247
nofor always G 12457
nofor always H 1257
nofor always I 247
nofor always J 2457
nofor always K 137
nofor always L 1237
nofor always M 1347
nofor always N 13457
nofor always O 1357
nofor always P 12347
nofor always Q 56-123457
nofor always R 12357
nofor always S 2347
nofor always T 23457
nofor always U 1367
nofor always V 12367
nofor always W 56-24567
nofor always X 56-13467
nofor always Y 134567
nofor always Z 56-13567
nofor always \x00c0 56-123567
nofor always \x00c1 1235678
nofor always \x00c2 1678
nofor always \x00c3 14678
nofor always \x00c4 34578
nofor always \x00c5 167
nofor always \x00c6 3457
nofor always \x00c7 56-123467
nofor always \x00c8 56-23467
nofor always \x00c9 56-1234567
nofor always \x00ca 56-1267
nofor always \x00cb 56-12467
nofor always \x00cc 15678
nofor always \x00cd 12678
nofor always \x00ce 56-1467
nofor always \x00cf 56-124567
nofor always \x00d0 67
nofor always \x00d1 1245678
nofor always \x00d2 124678
nofor always \x00d3 34678
nofor always \x00d4 56-14567
nofor always \x00d5 145678
nofor always \x00d6 24678
nofor always \x00d8 2467
nofor always \x00d9 56-234567
nofor always \x00da 125678
nofor always \x00db 56-1567
nofor always \x00dc 56-12567
nofor always \x00dd 13478
nofor always \x00de 1378
nofor always \x0100 5-17
nofor always \x0106 5-147
nofor always \x010e 5-1457
nofor always \x0112 5-157
nofor always \x011c 5-12457
nofor always \x0124 5-1257
nofor always \x0128 5-247
nofor always \x0134 5-2457
nofor always \x0136 5-137
nofor always \x0139 5-1237
nofor always \x0143 5-13457
nofor always \x014c 5-1357
nofor always \x0152 13578
nofor always \x0154 5-12357
nofor always \x0160 5-2347
nofor always \x0162 5-23457
nofor always \x0168 5-1367
nofor always \x0174 5-24567
nofor always \x0176 5-134567
nofor always \x0178 2345678
nofor always \x0179 5-13567
nofor always \x017d 56-3467
nofor always \x0386 458-5-17
nofor always \x0388 458-5-157
nofor always \x0389 458-5-1567
nofor always \x038A 458-5-247
nofor always \x038C 458-5-1357
nofor always \x038E 458-5-1367
nofor always \x038F 458-5-24567
nofor always \x0391 458-17
nofor always \x0392 458-127
nofor always \x0393 458-12457
nofor always \x0394 458-1457
nofor always \x0395 458-157
nofor always \x0396 458-13567
nofor always \x0397 458-1567
nofor always \x0398 458-14567
nofor always \x0399 458-247
nofor always \x039A 458-137
nofor always \x039B 458-1237
nofor always \x039C 458-1347
nofor always \x039D 458-13457
nofor always \x039E 458-13467
nofor always \x039F 458-1357
nofor always \x03A0 458-12347
nofor always \x03A1 458-12357
nofor always \x03A3 458-2347
nofor always \x03A4 458-23457
nofor always \x03A5 458-1367
nofor always \x03A6 458-1247
nofor always \x03A7 458-123467
nofor always \x03A8 458-134567
nofor always \x03A9 458-24567

### misc opcodes ###

# Emphasis opcodes
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold

begemphphrase italic 46
endemphphrase italic after 46

begemphphrase bold 46
endemphphrase bold after 46

begemphphrase underline 46
endemphphrase underline after 46

# special symbols
hyphen - 36
letsign 56
noletsign IQWXZiqwxz\x0149
noletsignbefore 1234567890

capsletter f
multind f-56 capsletter letsign
multind 56-f letsign capsletter
capsnocont

# The Danish use of letsign differs somewhat from the LibLouis way.
# In order to be sure that we are getting a letsign when we want one, we are sometimes getting an overlap.

# Ensure that we have letsign between a digit and "st"
# and nd after a digit is not contracted
noback context _$d["st"]!$l @56-234-2345
noback context _$d["st"]~ @56-234-2345
noback context _$d["nd"]!$l @1345-145
noback context _$d["nd"]~ @1345-145
# The following lines are to ensure that we get a letsign between a digit and a single letter.
noback context $d[]$l!$l @56
noback context $d[]$l~ @56

### Correct - Forward translation

# Ensure that capsnocont does not stretch across dashes
noback correct $U["-"] "\xf8fe"

# Special characters that always need letsigns because they represent contractions
always \x00a1 56-256 # inverted exclamationmark

# Punctuation
# Ensure word contractions followed by ! back-translate correctly
postpunc ! 235

#Special sequences, urls emails and file names.
nocont $
nocont \\ # line cannot end with a backslash
nocont @
nocont ://
nocont www

# Remove space between § and numbers.
noback begnum § 578
begnum §\s 578
begnum §§\s 578-578
always §§ 578-578

#Words
word af 356
always 'af 4-1-124
word aldrig 1-35
word aig =
word alle 1-15
begnum ae 56-1-15
contraction ae
word allerede 1-123-1235
begnum alr 56-1-123-1235
contraction alr
word alligevel 1-123-1236
begnum alv 56-1-123-1236
contraction alv
word altid 1-2345-145
begnum atd 56-1-2345-145
contraction atd
word altså 1-16
begnum aå 56-1-16
contraction aå
word arbejde 1-12-1456
word abde =
word arbejdede 1-12-1456-1456
word abdede =
word arbejder 1-12-23456
word abder =
word arbejdet 1-12-2346
word abdet =
word at 1

word betyde 12-2345-1456
word btde =
word betyder 12-2345-23456
word btder =
word blevet 12-2345
begnum bt 56-12-2345
contraction bt
word blev 12-1236
begnum bv 56-12-1236
contraction bv
word blive 12-3456
word bve =
word bliver 12

word danmark 145-1345-13
begnum dnk 56-145-1345-13
contraction dnk
word danmarks 145-1345-13-234
begnum dnks 56-145-1345-13-234
contraction dnks
word dansk 145-123456
word dsk =
word danske 145-123456-15
word dske =
word derefter 23456-1356
word derst =
word deres 256
word derfor 23456-124
word derf =
word derigennem 23456-24-12456
word derige 1456-1235-24-12456
word dermed 23456-134
word derm =
word derned 23456-1246
word derne =
word derop 23456-135
word dero =
word derover 23456-1346
word deror =
word derpå 23456-1234
word derp =
word dersom 23456-234
word ders =
word dertil 23456-2345
word dert =
word derunder 23456-12345
word derved 23456-1236
word din 145-1345
begnum dn 56-145-1345
contraction dn
word disse 145-234
begnum ds 56-145-234
contraction ds
word dit 145-2345
begnum dt 56-145-2345
contraction dt
word du 145

word efter 1356
word eftersom 1356-234
word sts =
word eller 15
word endnu 15-136
begnum eu 56-15-136
contraction eu

word faktisk 124-13-2345
begnum fkt 56-124-13-2345
contraction fkt
word fik 124-13
begnum fk 56-124-13
contraction fk
word forbi 124-12
begnum fb 56-124-12
contraction fb
word fordi 124-145
begnum fd 56-124-145
contraction fd
word forskellige 124-123456-15
word fske =
word forskelligt 124-123456-2345
word fskt =
word forskellig 124-123456
word fsk =
word for 124
word fortælle 124-1256
word fte =
word fortæller 124-2345-156
word fter =
word fra 235
word første 124-1356-15
word fste =
word først 124-1356
word fst =
word før 246

word gang 1245-1245
begnum gg 56-1245-1245
contraction gg
word gange 1245-12456
word gge =
word gangene 1245-1245-15-1246
word ganske 1245-123456
word gsk =
word gennem 12456
word gik 1245-13
begnum gk 56-1245-13
contraction gk
word gjorde 1245-1456
word gde =
word gør 1245

word ham 236
word hans 13456-234
begnum ys 56-13456-234
contraction ys
word han 13456
word har 125
word havde 125-1456
word hde =
word have 125-3456
word hve =
word hele 125-123-15
begnum hle 56-125-123-15
contraction hle
word heller 125-123-1235
begnum hlr 56-125-123-1235
contraction hlr
word helt 125-2345
begnum ht 6-125-2345
contraction ht
word hendes 125-234
begnum hs 56-125-234
contraction hs
word hende 125-145
begnum hd 56-125-145
contraction hd
word hjælpe 125-1234-15
begnum hpe 56-125-1234-15
contraction hpe
word hjælpende 125-1234-15-1345-1456 # *** temporary patch
word hjælpendes 125-1234-15-1345-1456-234 # *** Temporary patch
word hjælper 125-1234-156
word hper =
word hun 136
word hvad 2456
word hvilke 2456-13-15
word hvke =
word hvilken 2456-13-126
word hvken =
word hvilket 2456-13-346
word hvket =
word hvis 2456-234
word hvs =
word hvordan 34-1
word hvora 34-56-1
word hvorefter 34-1356
word hvorst 34-234-2345
word hvorfor 34-124
word hvorf 34-56-124
word hvorigennem 34-24-12456
word hvorledes 34-15
word hvore 34-56-15
word hvormed 34-134
word hvorm 34-56-134
word hvornår 34-1345
word hvorn 34-56-1345
word hvorover 34-1346
word hvoror 34-135-1235
word hvorpå 34-1234
word hvorp 34-56-1234
word hvortil 34-2345
word hvort 34-56-2345
word hvorunder 34-12345
word hvornd 34-1345-145
word hvorved 34-1236
word hvorv 34-56-1236
word hvor 34

word igennem 24-12456
word ige =
word igen 35
word (igen) 236-24-1245-126-356
word ikke 24-13
begnum ik 56-24-13
contraction ik
word ingen 24-126
word ien =
word ingenting 24-24
begnum ii 56-24-24
contraction ii

word jeg 245
word jeg) 245-56-356

word kan 13
word kommer 13-156
word ker =
word kommet 13-346
word ket =
word komme 13-146
word kme =
word kom 13-134
begnum km 56-13-134
contraction km
word kunne 13-1246
word kne =
word kvinde 13-1236-1456
word kvde =
word kvindes 13-1236-1456-234
word kvdes =
word kvinden 13-1236-12346
word kvden =
word kvindens 13-1236-12346-234
word kvdens =
word kvinder 13-1236-23456
word kvder =
word kvinders 13-1236-23456-234
word kvders =
word kvinderne 13-1236-23456-1246
word kvderne =
word kvindernes 13-1236-23456-1246-234
word kvdernes =

word lang 123-1245
begnum lg 56-123-1245
contraction lg
word lange 123-12456
begnum lge 56-123-12456
contraction lge
word langt 123-1245-2345
begnum lgt 56-123-1245-2345
contraction lgt
word lidt 123-2345
begnum lt 56-123-2345
contraction lt
word ligesom 123-234
begnum ls 56-123-234
contraction ls
word lige 123
word lille 123-123
begnum ll 56-123-123
contraction ll

word mange 134-12456
word mge =
word med 134
word megen 146-126
word meen =
word meget 146-346
word meet =
word mellem 146-134
word mem =
word men 146
word menneske 146-123456-15
word meske =
word menneskes 146-123456-15-234
word meskes =
word menneskene 146-123456-15-1246
word meskene =
word menneskenes 146-123456-15-1246-234
word meskenes =
word mennesker 146-123456-156
word meskr =
word menneskers 146-123456-156-234
word meskrs =
word mennesket 146-123456-346
word meskt =
word menneskets 146-123456-346-234
word meskts =
word min 134-1345
begnum mn 56-134-1345
contraction mn
word mit 134-2345
begnum mt 56-145-2345
contraction mt
word mulighed 134-123-125
begnum mlh 56-134-123-125
contraction mlh
word muligheds 134-123-125-234
begnum mlhs 56-134-123-125-234
contraction mlhs
word muligheden 134-123-125-126
begnum mlhen 56-134-123-125-15-1345
contraction mlhen
word mulighedens 134-123-125-126-234
begnum mlhens 56-134-123-125-15-1345-234
contraction mlhens
word muligheder 134-123-125-156
word mlhder =
word muligheders 134-123-125-156-234
word mlhders =
word mulighederne 134-123-125-156-1246
word mlhderne =
word mulighedernes 134-123-125-156-1246-234
word mlhdernes =
word måske 134-123456
word msk =
word måtte 134-1256
word mte =

word naturlig 1345-2345-123
begnum ntl 56-1345-2345-123
contraction ntl
word naturligt 1345-2345-123-2345
begnum ntlt 56-1345-2345-123-2345
contraction ntlt
word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
begnum ntv 56-1345-2345-1236
contraction ntv
word ned 1246
word nogen 1345-1345
begnum nn 56-1345-1345
contraction nn
word nogensinde 1345-234-1456
word nsde =
word noget 1345-2345
begnum nt 56-1345-2345
contraction nt
word nogle 1345-123-15
begnum nle 56-1345-123-15
contraction nle
word næste 1345-1256
word nte =
word næsten 1345-126
word nen =
word når 1345

word også 14-16
begnum cå 56-14-16
contraction cå
word og 14
word omkring 135-134-13
begnum omk 56-135-134-13
contraction omk
word op 135
word or =
word organisation 1346-1245-234
word orgs =
word organisations 1346-1245-234-234
word orgss =
word organisationen 1346-1245-234-126
word orgsen =
word organisationens 1346-1245-234-126-234
word orgsens =
word organisationer 1346-1245-234-156
word orgser =
word organisationers 1346-1245-234-156-234
word orgsers =
word organisationerne 1346-1245-234-156-1246
word orgserne =
word organisationernes 1346-1245-234-156-1246-234
word orgsernes =
word over 1346
